Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.25.110

Selling, leasing, exchanging, or disposing of property—Voting requirements.

(1) In addition to approval in accordance with RCW 23B.12.020, a proposed transaction in which the social purpose corporation is to sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all, or substantially all, of its property, otherwise than in the usual and regular course of business, must be approved by two-thirds of the voting group comprising all the votes entitled to be cast on the transaction, and by two-thirds of the holders of the outstanding shares of each class or series, voting as separate voting groups, and of each other voting group entitled under the articles of incorporation to vote separately on the proposed transaction. The articles of incorporation may require a greater vote than that provided for in this section.

(2) The additional approval described in subsection (1) of this section is not required if the acquirer of such property is a social purpose corporation governed by this chapter and includes a specific social purpose or purposes that do not materially differ from the disposing corporation's specific social purpose or purposes, if any.

[ 2012 c 215 s 12.]